Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-248
Delivery of certificate to limited partner.

Upon the return by the Secretary of State pursuant to section 67-245 of a certificate marked filed, the general partners shall promptly deliver or mail a copy of the certificate to each limited partner if the partnership agreement so requires.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 16;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 21.